Vermont, session 2025-2026, H705.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Student Secular Bill of Rights.”
Sec. 2. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 2 of 15
(1) The separation of religion and government is a cornerstone of
American jurisprudence, recognized foremost in the First Amendment to the
U.S. Constitution and in all 50 of the states’ constitutions.
(2) Protecting religious freedom and conscience rights serves students of
all faiths and none, ensuring that no student is compelled to participate in
religious exercises against the student’s beliefs or nonbeliefs.
(3) In 1802, President Thomas Jefferson, an original supporter of the
First Amendment to the U.S. Constitution, alongside primary author James
Madison, described the First Amendment as “building a wall of separation
between church and state.”
(4) The U.S. Supreme Court declared in the 1947 case Everson v. Board
of Education, 330 U.S. 1, 18 (1947), that, “The First Amendment has erected a
wall between church and state. That wall must be kept high and impregnable.
We could not approve the slightest breach.”
(5) The Supreme Court also declared in the same case that the
Establishment Clause “means at least this: Neither a state nor the Federal
Government can set up a church. Neither can pass laws which aid one
religion, aid all religions, or prefer one religion over another…No tax in any
amount, large or small, can be levied to support any religious activities or
institutions…Neither a state nor the Federal Government can, openly or
secretly, participate in the affairs of any religious organizations or groups, and
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 3 of 15
vice versa. In the words of Jefferson, the clause against establishment of
religion by law was intended to erect ‘a wall of separation between Church and
State.’” (Id. at 15-16).
(6) Democrats and Republicans alike, united in dedication to America’s
founding principles, have recognized the indispensable principle of separation
between church and state, with President Ronald Reagan saying in 1984 that,
“We establish no religion in this country, we command no worship, we
mandate no belief, nor will we ever. Church and state are, and must remain,
separate.”
(7) All persons have the fundamental and inalienable right to worship,
or not, according to the dictates of their own conscience, free from
governmental influence or interference, provided their practices do not excuse
acts of lawlessness, or justify practices inconsistent with the order, peace, or
safety of the state, or the rights of others.
(8) The U.S. Supreme Court has addressed the First Amendment in an
education context in several cases, including:
(A) In the 1948 decision McCollum v. Board of Education, 333 U.S.
203, 211 (1948), the Court held that a “released time” program in public
schools, where religious instruction was provided by outside teachers during
school hours, violated the Establishment Clause because using public school
facilities and resources to “aid any or all religious faiths or sects in the
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 4 of 15
dissemination of their doctrines and ideals” constituted an unconstitutional
endorsement of religion.
(B) In the 1962 decision Engel v. Vitale, 370 U.S. 421 (1962), the
Court held that prayer composed by the state and recited over the intercom in
public schools violates the U.S. Constitution’s Establishment Clause.
(C) In the 1968 decision Epperson v. Arkansas, 393 U.S. 97 (1968),
the Court held that a state law prohibiting the teaching of evolution in public
schools violated the Establishment Clause of the First Amendment because the
law was enacted to advance a particular religious viewpoint, constituting
government endorsement of religion.
(D) In the 1980 decision Stone v. Graham, 449 U.S. 39, 41 (1980),
the Court held that a law requiring the posting of privately funded Ten
Commandments displays in public school classrooms violated the
Establishment Clause because the “pre-eminent purpose for posting the Ten
Commandments on schoolroom walls is plainly religious in nature.”
(E) In 1987 decision Edwards v. Aguillard, 482 U.S. 578, 591
(1987), the Court held that a Louisiana law prohibiting the teaching of
evolution unless accompanied by instruction in “creation science” was
unconstitutional because the “preeminent purpose of the Louisiana Legislature
was clearly to advance the religious viewpoint that a supernatural being created
humankind,” while an offered secular purpose for the law was “a sham.”
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 5 of 15
(F) In the 1992 decision Lee v. Weisman, 505 U.S. 577, 589 (1992),
the Court held that public schools cannot provide even nonsectarian prayer at
public school events, that “preservation and transmission of religious beliefs
and worship is a responsibility and choice committed to the private sphere,”
and that it was not a remedy to simply say that students could avoid the prayer
by foregoing their own graduation.
(G) In the 2000 decision Santa Fe Independent School District v.
Doe, 530 U.S. 290, 309 (2000), the Court held that school-sponsored prayer at
a public school event violates the U.S. Constitution by sending the message to
nonbelievers that “‘they are outsiders, not full members of the political
community,’” even when those prayers are student-led (quoting Lynch v.
Donnelly, 465 U.S. 668, 688 (1984)).
(9) These rulings by the U.S. Supreme Court are in danger of being
overturned or otherwise eroded by future rulings.
(10) The protection of religious and academic freedom in public schools
must be strengthened through statutory protections to preserve the integrity of
public education and ensure that all students may exercise their fundamental
rights.
(11) The Vermont Constitution provides a vehicle for protecting these
rights at the State level.
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 6 of 15
(12) It is the State’s inherent duty as sovereign to guarantee the rights of
its residents.
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 1625 is added to read:
§ 1625. STUDENT SECULAR BILL OF RIGHTS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Academic study of religion” means objective, educational
examination of religious traditions, texts, history, or practices for secular
scholarly purposes, conducted in a manner that neither promotes nor denigrates
any particular religious belief or nonbelief.
(2) “Club” means a noncurricular student group recognized by a school
district that meets the fair opportunity criteria of the Equal Access Act of 1984,
20 U.S.C. § 4071(c).
(3) “Coerce” means exerting direct or indirect pressure, whether through
official policy, practice, or conduct, that would compel a reasonable student to
participate in or refrain from religious exercise against the student’s
conscience.
(4) “Endorsement” means a governmental practice that a reasonable
observer would view as government approval, favor, or disapproval of religion
or particular religious beliefs.
(5) “Nonparticipatory capacity” means presence at a student religious
club meeting or event solely for supervisory purposes, consistent with the
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 7 of 15
Equal Access Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 4071–4074, without lecturing, proselytizing,
praying, preaching, planning religious events, or otherwise engaging in
religious activities.
(6) “Official capacity” means when a person is:
(A) performing official duties or furthering the work of a school
district or school board; or
(B) acting under or with power or authority granted by virtue of
employment by or association with a school district or school board.
(7) “Prayer” means a communication, either spoken or written, directed
toward a deity, deities, or other supernatural or spiritual force, including a
benediction, invocation, chant, or request for guidance, blessing, forgiveness,
or intervention.
(8) “Proselytizing” means attempting to convert individuals from one
religion, religious belief, or nonbelief to another through persuasion or
inducement.
(9) “Public official” means any elected official, appointed official, or
employee of a state or local unit of government, including any employee of a
public school district or public school board.
(10) “Religious activity” means any practice, observance, or expression
intended primarily for religious purposes, including prayer, worship, religious
instruction, or proselytizing.
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 8 of 15
(11) “Religious display” means any visual presentation of religious
symbols, texts, imagery, or artifacts that conveys a religious message or
promotes religious beliefs.
(12) “Religious text” means writing that is used primarily for
devotional, worship, or proselytizing purposes rather than for legitimate
academic study of religion, religious history, or comparative religion.
(13) “School” means:
(A) any public school as that term is defined in subdivision 11(a)(7)
of this title; and
(B) any approved independent school as that term is defined in
subdivision 11(a)(20) of this title that is eligible to receive public tuition
pursuant to section 828 of this title.
(14) “School event” means any activity at a school facility or sponsored,
conducted, or supervised by a school official acting in official capacity,
including graduation, grade-promotion ceremony, award program, induction
ceremony, pep rally, competition, practice, performance, class instructional
time, and club meeting or event. “School event” does not include:
(A) a student religious club meeting or event, if all school employees
and agents are only present at the meeting or event in a nonparticipatory
capacity;
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 9 of 15
(B) an activity at a school facility, if it is outside the presence of
students and no school official acts in official capacity; or
(C) an activity at a school facility that is used by a third party
pursuant to a standard facility use agreement or advance written permission
that indicates the responsible third-party user, use period, facility to be used,
purpose of use, and conditions of use, provided such use occurs during the
agreed period, is on terms consistent with other third-party users, involves no
school official acting in official capacity, and does not take place during school
hours.
(15) “School official” means any employee, agent, or representative of a
public school or school district, including teachers, administrators, coaches,
and support staff.
(16) “School property” means any building, facility, grounds, or vehicle
owned, leased, or controlled by a school or school district.
(17) “Secular purpose” means an objective that is not primarily religious
in nature and serves a legitimate educational, administrative, or civic function.
(b) Rights of students. Students in all schools shall enjoy:
(1) The right to practice any religion they choose on school grounds or
at school events, provided that their practices are orderly and do not inhibit the
operations or safety of the school or infringe on the rights of others.
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 10 of 15
(2) The right to not practice any religion whatsoever, if they so choose,
on school property or at school events.
(3) The right to be free from discrimination based on their religious
beliefs or lack thereof.
(4) The right to be free from school-sponsored religious teachings or
practices of all kinds on school property or at school events, including:
(A) staff-led prayer;
(B) prayer led by nonstaff adults or students, when it is:
(i) sponsored by the school; or
(ii) supported by the school by means of marketing, planning,
audiovisual equipment, or endorsement by any member of school staff or the
school itself;
(C) any religious instruction as part of a school curriculum, including
creationism and intelligent design; or
(D) required or coerced reading of religious texts other than for the
academic study of religion; provided, however, that any academic study of
religion that includes instruction of religious perspectives shall include
multiple religious perspectives.
(5)(A) The right to be free of school-sponsored religious displays on
school property or at school events, including:
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 11 of 15
(i) the Ten Commandments and similar statements of religious
doctrine;
(ii) the Christian cross, the Star of David, the Star and Crescent of
Islam, and similar symbols; and
(iii) depictions of holy figures, prophets, or spiritual leaders for
the purpose of promoting religious adherence.
(B) This subdivision (b)(5) shall not apply to:
(i) de minimis wardrobe items such as necklaces, rings, or
headdresses; or
(ii) displays in a private office area, provided the display is not
obvious to students or the public.
(6) The right to be free from school-sponsored religious messaging on
school property or at school events, including at school assemblies and in the
classroom. This section shall not prohibit:
(A) student-created religious expression in individual assignments or
projects, provided the work addresses the learning objectives required by the
curriculum; or
(B) reasonable accommodation of religious practices, including:
(i) reasonable scheduling accommodations for religious
observances;
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 12 of 15
(ii) dietary accommodations consistent with religious
requirements;
(iii) styling of hair or personal grooming practices consistent with
religious or cultural practices;
(iv) wearing of religious items, jewelry, and regalia, including
Indigenous traditional regalia and religious items; and
(v) any personal expression of religious practices, or of nonbelief,
provided such practices:
(I) do not interfere with the rights of others or the safe and
normal functioning of the school; and
(II) are not done by school staff operating in their official
capacity.
(7) The right to refuse to engage in religious discussions or to otherwise
reject unwanted proselytizing by other students.
(8) The right to be free from incentives, offered by either the school or
school staff, to participate in religious activities during school hours facilitated
by third-party organizations, including through the offer of money, food,
school supplies, or other items not otherwise available in the school.
(c) Grievance procedures.
(1) Each school district and approved independent school that is eligible
to receive public tuition shall establish a formal grievance procedure for
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 13 of 15
students, parents, and staff to report violations of this section. Complaints
shall be acknowledged in writing within seven days following receipt.
Complaints shall be investigated within 30 days following receipt. A written
determination and an action plan identifying necessary and specific steps to
remediate any violations found shall be issued by the district immediately
following the investigation, and within 40 days following receipt the
complaint.
(2) Complainants shall have the right to appeal to the Agency of
Education.
(d) Private right of action.
(1) Any student or parent of a student who alleges a violation of this
section may bring a civil action in the Civil Division of the Superior Court for
damages, injunctive relief, punitive damages in the case of an intentional
violation, and reasonable costs and attorney’s fees.
(2) No qualified or good-faith immunity shall apply to public officials
who knowingly violate the provisions of this section.
(3) Actions must be brought within two years following the date of the
alleged violation.
(4) For purposes of enforcing this section, any student currently enrolled
or who was enrolled in a school at the time of the alleged violation, or the
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 14 of 15
student’s parent or guardian, shall have standing to bring suit, without having
to demonstrate any economic injury.
(e) Whistleblower protection. No school employee shall be subject to
discipline or retaliation for reporting, in good faith, a violation of this section.
(f) Training and guidance.
(1) The Agency of Education shall:
(A) develop and provide training materials for school districts and
schools regarding compliance with this section; and
(B) develop and from time to time update model student secular
rights policies and guidance documents to assist school districts and schools
with compliance with this section.
(2) School districts and schools shall:
(A) provide training to all school officials regarding compliance with
this section; and
(B) adopt, ensure the enforcement of, and make available in the
manner described under subdivision 563(1) of this title a student secular rights
policy that shall be at least as stringent as the model policy developed by the
Agency. Any school board or school that fails to adopt a policy shall be
presumed to have adopted the most current model policy published by the
Agency.
VT LEG #386118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.705
2026 Page 15 of 15
Sec. 4. IMPLEMENTATION
(a) The Agency of Education shall issue the guidance and model student
secular rights policy required under 16 V.S.A. § 1625(f)(1) on or before
September 1, 2026.
(b) School districts shall have 120 days from issuance of the Agency’s
model student secular rights policy to adopt a policy consistent with the
requirements of 16 V.S.A. § 1625(f)(2)(B).
(c) School districts shall provide annual training regarding the requirements
of 16 V.S.A. § 1625 beginning with the 2026–2027 school year.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386118 v.1